Vermont statutes. Title 6 Agriculture
Subchapter 2. Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets

§ 2701.
Rules.

The Secretary, in accordance with 3 V.S.A. chapter 25, shall adopt, and may amend and rescind, dairy sanitation rules relating to dairy products to enforce this chapter, including labeling, weighing, measuring and testing facilities, buildings, equipment, methods, procedures, health of animals, health and capability of personnel, and quality standards. In addition, the uniform regulation for sanitation requirements, as adopted by the National Conference on Interstate Milk Shippers, and published by the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services, Public Health Service, Food and Drug Administration, Grade A Pasteurized Milk Ordinance (PMO), as amended, supplemented, or revised, are adopted as part of this chapter, except that any exemption to the preventative controls for human food requirements for Grade “A” milk and milk products for a very small business, as defined in the PMO and federal regulations, shall not apply. The Secretary may modify or reject by rule the PMO. When adherence to the PMO is deemed unreasonable by the Agency for non-Grade “A” products, the most current version of the Recommended Requirements of the U.S. Department of Agriculture, Agricultural Marketing Service, Milk for Manufacturing Purposes and its Production and Processing may be used.

The Secretary shall adopt and from time to time amend or terminate rules concerning but not limited to the taking and storing of samples, sampling equipment, approved tests, testing equipment, methods and procedures for performing tests, and related trade practices which are used as a basis for payment or acceptance for dairy products. The Secretary shall adopt, amend, or terminate rules concerning examination for and the granting and terminating of dairy technician’s licenses.

HISTORY:

Added

1965, No. 175

, §§ 8, 32; amended

1969, No. 73

, § 2, eff. April 18, 1969;

2001, No. 39

, § 3;

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003;

2011, No. 39

, § 1, eff. May 19, 2011;

2015, No. 23

, § 76;

2017, No. 113

(Adj. Sess.), § 27;

2019, No. 83

, § 16.

§ 2702.
Repealed. 1999, No. 49, § 121.

§ 2703.
Grading services.

The Secretary is authorized to cooperate with the federal government in furnishing inspection or grading service for dairy products to milk handlers and other persons.
The Secretary shall establish uniform fees for this service.

HISTORY:

Added

1965, No. 175

, § 34; amended

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003.

§ 2704.
Trustee of handlers’ bonds.

All bonds or other securities required and furnished under the provisions of this part shall be given to the Secretary as trustee for each and all of the producers in this State and shall be conditioned for the faithful performance by the handler of all the acts prescribed and all the conditions imposed upon the handler by this part, and for compliance by the handler of all the general laws of this State now in force or hereafter enacted and regulations pursuant thereto.

HISTORY:

Added

1965, No. 175

, § 23; amended

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003.

§ 2705.
Revocation of licenses.

The Secretary may after due notice and hearing revoke a handler’s license if after due investigation made by him or her the handler is deemed to be in violation of any provisions of this part or the regulations promulgated thereunder. The Secretary is charged with the administration and enforcement of this part.

If the Secretary is unable to secure compliance with the provisions of this part and the rules adopted thereunder, he or she shall report the matter to the Attorney General, together with all relevant information. Except as provided in section 2881 of this title, the Attorney General shall take such action as the public interest requires, including injunctions or prosecution in any court of competent jurisdiction.

HISTORY:

Added

1965, No. 175

, § 73; amended

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003;

2017, No. 113

(Adj. Sess.), § 28.